Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Penalties

440.990.
Penalty.

Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his custody under the Governor’s warrant, in willful disobedience to KRS

440.250

, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be fined not less than one hundred ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned in the county jail not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 12, effective June 16, 1960.